Utah statutes.
58-37-5.5.   Recognized controlled substance analogs.
(1)  A substance listed under Subsection (2) is an analog, as defined in
Subsection 58-37-2(1)(g), if the substance, in any quantity, and in any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation, is present in:
(a)  any product manufactured, distributed, or possessed for the purpose of
human consumption; or
(b)  any product, the use or administration of which results in human
consumption.
(2)  Substances referred to in Subsection (1) include, but are not limited to:
(a)  gamma butyrolactone (GBL);
(b)  butyrolactone;
(c)  1,2 butanolide;
(d)  2-oxanolone;
(e)  tetrahydro-2-furanone;
(f)  dihydro-2 (3H)-furanone;
(g)  tetramethylene glycol;
(h)  1,4 butanediol; and
(i)  gamma valerolactone.
